Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.160.191

Student transportation allocation—Adequacy for certain districts—Adjustment.

The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that the allocation formula results in adequate appropriation for low enrollment districts, nonhigh districts, districts involved in cooperative transportation agreements, and cooperative special transportation services operated by educational service districts. If necessary, the superintendent shall develop a separate process to adjust the allocation of the districts.

[ 2009 c 548 s 309.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 548 ss 304-311: See note following RCW 28A.160.150.

Intent—2009 c 548: See RCW 28A.150.1981.

Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.410.270.

Intent—Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.305.130.